Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 10. Liability of Trustees and Rights of Persons Dealing with Trustee.

§ 91-8-1001.
Remedies for breach of trust.

A violation by a trustee of a duty the trustee owes to a beneficiary is a breach of trust.

To remedy a breach of trust that has occurred or may occur, the court may:

Compel the trustee to perform the trustee’s duties;

Enjoin the trustee from committing a breach of trust;

Compel the trustee to redress a breach of trust by paying money, restoring property, or other means;

Order a trustee to account;

Appoint a special fiduciary to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust;

Suspend the trustee;

Remove the trustee as provided in Section 91-8-706;

Reduce or deny compensation to the trustee;

Subject to Section 91-8-1012, void an act of the trustee, impose a lien or a constructive trust on trust property, or trace trust property wrongfully disposed of and recover the property or its proceeds; or

Order any other appropriate relief whether provided elsewhere in this chapter, available at common law or under equity principles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1002.
Damages for breach of trust.

A trustee who commits a breach of trust is liable to the beneficiaries affected for:

The greater of:

The amount required to restore the value of the trust property and trust distributions to what they would have been had the breach not occurred; or

The profit the trustee made by reason of the breach; and

Any measure of damages otherwise provided by law.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (b), if more than one (1) trustee is liable to the beneficiaries for a breach of trust, a trustee is entitled to contribution from the other trustee or trustees. A trustee is not entitled to contribution if the trustee was substantially more at fault than another trustee or if the trustee committed the breach of trust in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries. A trustee who received a benefit from the breach of trust is not entitled to contribution from another trustee to the extent of the benefit received.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1003.
Damages in absence of breach.

Absent a breach of trust, a trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for a loss or depreciation in the value of trust property or for not having made a profit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 79, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1004.
Attorney’s fees and costs.

In a judicial proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the court, as justice and equity may require, may award costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, to any party, to be paid by another party or from the trust that is the subject of the controversy.

In a nonjudicial proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the trustee may pay fees, other reasonable costs, and expenses from trust assets where all of the parties to the proceeding agree in writing.

In a mediation or arbitration proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the mediator or arbitrator may award fees, other reasonable costs, and expenses against the assets of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 80, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1005.
Limitation of action against trustee by a beneficiary, a trustee, trust advisor or trust protector.

A beneficiary may not commence a proceeding against a trustee for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the beneficiary or a representative of the beneficiary was sent a report that adequately disclosed the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.

A report adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary or beneficiary’s representative knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.

If subsection (a) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a beneficiary against a trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:

The removal, resignation, or death of the trustee;

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

A trustee may not commence a proceeding against a cotrustee or a former trustee for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the trustee or a representative of the trustee was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.

A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the trustee or the trustee’s representative knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.

If subsection (d) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a trustee against a cotrustee or former trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:

The removal, resignation, or death of the cotrustee or a former trustee;

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

A trust advisor or trust protector may not commence a proceeding against a trustee or a former trustee for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the trust advisor or trust protector or the respective representative of each was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.

A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the trust advisor or trust protector or the respective representative of each knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.

If subsection (g) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a trust advisor or trust protector against a trustee or former trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:

The removal, resignation, or death of the trustee or a former trustee;

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

Notwithstanding subsections (d) through (i), no trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector may commence a proceeding against a trustee or a former trustee if, under subsections (a) through (c) of this section, none of the beneficiaries may commence a proceeding against the cotrustee or former trustee for the breach of trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 81, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1006.
Reliance on trust instrument.

A trustee who acts in reasonable reliance on the terms of the trust as expressed in the trust instrument is not liable to a beneficiary for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 82, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1007.
Event affecting administration or distribution.

If the happening of an event, including marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements, or death, affects the administration or distribution of a trust, a trustee who has exercised reasonable care to ascertain the happening of the event is not liable for a loss resulting from the trustee’s lack of knowledge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 83, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1008.
Exculpation of trustee.

A provision of a trust relieving a trustee of liability for breach of trust is unenforceable to the extent that it:

Relieves the trustee of liability for breach of trust committed in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries; or

Was inserted as the result of an abuse by the trustee of a fiduciary or confidential relationship to the settlor.

Except for provisions intended to provide protection for carrying out a stated purpose in the trust instrument, an exculpatory provision drafted or caused to be drafted by the trustee is invalid as an abuse of a fiduciary or confidential relationship unless the trustee proves that the exculpatory provision is fair under the circumstances and that its existence and contents were adequately communicated to the settlor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 84, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1009.
Beneficiary’s consent, release, or ratification.

A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for breach of trust if the beneficiary consented to the conduct constituting the breach, released the trustee from liability for the breach, or ratified the transaction constituting the breach, unless:

The consent, release, or ratification of the beneficiary was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

At the time of the consent, release, or ratification, the beneficiary did not know of the material facts relating to the breach and the trustee had actual knowledge of the facts relating to the alleged breach.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 85, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1010.
Limitation on personal liability of trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the contract, a trustee is not personally liable on a contract properly entered into in the trustee’s fiduciary capacity in the course of administering the trust if the trustee in the contract disclosed the fiduciary capacity.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) or (c), the debts, obligations and liabilities incurred by a trustee by reason of the ownership, management, or control of trust property in the trustee’s fiduciary capacity, shall be enforceable solely against the trust and its property, without any obligation or liability personally being borne by any trustee of the trust.

Except as otherwise limited by state law, a trustee is personally liable for torts committed in the course of administering a trust only if the trustee is personally at fault.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a trustee in the trustee’s fiduciary capacity, on an obligation arising from ownership or control of trust property, or on a tort committed in the course of administering a trust, may be asserted in a judicial proceeding against the trustee in the trustee’s fiduciary capacity, whether or not the trustee is personally liable for the claim.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 86, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1011.
Interest as general partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) or unless personal liability is imposed in the contract, a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner in a general or limited partnership is not personally liable on a contract entered into by the partnership after the trust’s acquisition of the interest if the fiduciary capacity was disclosed in the contract or in a statement previously filed pursuant to the Uniform Partnership Act, Title 79, Chapter 13, Mississippi Code of 1972, or the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, Title 79, Chapter 14, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner is not personally liable for torts committed by the partnership or for obligations arising from ownership or control of the interest unless the trustee is personally at fault.

The immunity provided by this section does not apply if an interest in the partnership is held by the trustee in a capacity other than that of trustee.

If the trustee of a revocable trust holds an interest as a general partner, the settlor is personally liable for contracts and other obligations of the partnership as if the settlor were a general partner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1012.
Protection of person dealing with trustee.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a trustee, or who in good faith and for value deals with a trustee, without actual knowledge that the trustee is exceeding or improperly exercising the trustee’s powers is protected from liability as if the trustee properly exercised the power.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a trustee or deals with a trustee is not required to inquire into the extent of the trustee’s powers or the propriety of their exercise.

A person who in good faith delivers assets to a trustee need not ensure their proper application.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a former trustee, or who in good faith and for value deals with a former trustee, without actual knowledge that the trusteeship has terminated, is protected from liability as if the former trustee were still a trustee.

Comparable protective provisions of other laws relating to commercial transactions or transfer of securities by fiduciaries prevail over the protection provided by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 88; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1013.
Certification of trust.

Instead of furnishing a copy of the trust instrument to any person to evidence the existence and validity of the trust, the trustee may furnish to the person a certification of trust, signed by the trustee or trustees having signature authority as identified in paragraph (6) of this subsection, attested by a notary public, and shall contain the following:

An affirmation of the current existence of the trust and the date on which the trust came into existence;

The identity of the settlor or settlors;

The identity and address of the currently acting trustee or trustees and may contain the identity and address of the named successor trustee or trustees or a statement that no successor is named;

The administrative or managerial powers of the trustee in a pending transaction or relevant to the request;

The revocability or irrevocability of the trust and the identity of any person holding a power to revoke the trust;

When there are multiple trustees or multiple successor trustees, the signature authority of the trustees indicating whether all or less than all of the currently acting trustees are required to sign in order to exercise various powers of the trustee;

Where there are successor trustees designated, a statement detailing the conditions for their succession or a statement that a third party may rely on the authority of one or more successors without proof of their succession;

The trust’s Taxpayer Identification Number, whether a social security number or Employer Identification Number, but only if the trust’s identification number is essential to the transaction for which the request for the trust document is made;

The name in which title to trust property may be taken; and

A statement that, to the best of the trustee’s knowledge, the trust has not been revoked, modified, or amended in any manner that would cause the representations contained in the certification of trust to be incorrect.

The certification of trust shall not be required to contain the dispositive provisions of a trust that set forth the distribution of the trust estate.

The trustee offering the certification of trust may provide copies of all or any part of the trust document and amendments, if any. Nothing in this section is intended to require or imply an obligation to provide dispositive provisions of the trust or a copy of the entire trust documents and amendments.

A person who acts in reliance upon a certification of trust without knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect is not liable to any person for so acting. A person who does not have actual knowledge that the facts contained in the certification of trust are incorrect may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the certification. Actual knowledge shall not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of the trust instrument is held by the person relying on the trust certification. Nothing contained in this section shall limit the rights of the beneficiaries of the trust against the trustee. Any person relying on the certification of trust shall be indemnified from the assets of the trust to the extent of the share of the trust attributable to the beneficiary or beneficiaries bringing any action against the person for any costs, damage, attorney fees, or other expenses incurred in defending any action against the person arising for the transaction to which a certification of trust related.

A person’s failure to request a certification of trust does not affect the protections provided that person in this section. No inference that the person has not acted in good faith or that the person was negligent may be drawn from the failure of the person to request a certification of trust. Nothing in this section is intended to create an implication that a person is liable for acting in reliance on a certification of trust under circumstances where the requirements of this section are not satisfied.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a third party, when presented with a trust certificate, to enter into a contract with a trustee relating to trust assets or obligations, or to preclude a third party from demanding as a precondition to any contract that the trustee provide additional information in order to clarify any ambiguities or inconsistencies in the trust certificate.

This section does not limit the right of a person to obtain a copy of the trust instrument in a judicial proceeding concerning the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 89; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1014.
Enforcement of no-contest, in terrorem or forfeiture provisions.

For the purposes of this section, “no-contest provision” includes a “no-contest provision,” “in terrorem provision” or “forfeiture provision” of a trust instrument. A “no-contest provision” means a provision that, if given effect, would reduce or eliminate the interest of any beneficiary of the trust who, directly or indirectly, initiates or otherwise pursues:

Any action to contest the validity of the trust or the terms of the trust;

Any action to set aside or vary the terms of the trust;

Any action to challenge the acts of the trustee or other fiduciary of the trust in the performance of the trustee’s or other fiduciary’s duties as described in the terms of the trust; or

Any other act or proceedings to frustrate or defeat the settlor’s intent as expressed in the terms of the trust.

Undue influence;

Mistake;

Forgery; or

Irregularity in the execution of the trust instrument.

With regard to whether the beneficiary sought, received or relied upon legal counsel, a no-contest provision shall be enforceable according to the express terms of the no-contest provision without regard to the beneficiary’s good or bad faith in taking the action that would justify the complete or partial forfeiture of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust under the terms of the no-contest provision unless probable cause exists for the beneficiary taking such action on the grounds of:

Fraud;

Duress;

Revocation;

Lack of testamentary capacity;

Subsection (b) shall not apply to:

Any action brought solely to challenge the acts of the trustee or other fiduciary of the trust to the extent that the trustee or other fiduciary has committed a breach of fiduciary duties or breach of trust;

Any action brought by the trustee or any other fiduciary serving under the terms of the trust, unless the trustee or other fiduciary is a beneficiary against whom the no-contest provision is otherwise enforceable;

Any agreement among the beneficiaries and any other interested persons in settlement of a dispute or resolution of any other matter relating to the trust, including, without limitation, any nonjudicial settlement agreement;

Any action to determine whether a proposed or pending motion, petition, or other proceeding constitutes a contest within the meaning of a no-contest provision;

Any action brought by a beneficiary or on behalf of any such beneficiary for a construction or interpretation of the terms of the trust; or

Any action brought by the Attorney General for a construction or interpretation of a charitable trust or a trust containing a charitable interest if a provision exists in a trust purporting to penalize a charity or charitable interest for contesting the trust if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings.

Pursuant to this section, courts shall enforce the settlor’s intent as reflected in a no-contest provision to the greatest extent possible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 90, eff from and after July 1, 2014.